Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Chapter 07. Medical Assistance for Needy Persons.
Sec. 47.07.039.
Coordinated care demonstration projects.

The department shall contract with one or more third parties to implement one or more coordinated care demonstration projects for recipients of medical assistance identified by the department. The purpose of a demonstration project under this section is to assess the efficacy of a proposed health care delivery model with respect to cost for, access to, and quality of care for medical assistance recipients. The department may contract for separate demonstration projects to coordinate care for different groups of medical assistance recipients to achieve more effective care for recipients at greater cost savings for the medical assistance program. The department shall request proposals for at least one project under this section on or before December 31, 2016, and may annually request proposals for additional projects under this section thereafter. The department may use an innovative procurement process as described under AS

36.30.308

to award a contract for a project under this section. A proposal for a demonstration project under this section must be submitted to the committee established under (b) of this section and must include three or more of the following elements:

comprehensive primary-care-based management for medical assistance services, including behavioral health services and coordination of long-term services and support;

care coordination, including the assignment of a primary care provider located in the local geographic area of the recipient, to the extent practical;

health promotion;

comprehensive transitional care and follow-up care after inpatient treatment;

referral to community and social support services, including career and education training services available through the Department of Labor and Workforce Development under AS 23.15, the University of Alaska, or other sources;

sustainability and the ability to achieve similar results in other regions of the state;

integration and coordination of benefits, services, and utilization management;

local accountability for health and resource allocation;

an innovative payment process, including bundled payments or global payments.

A project review committee is established in the department for the purpose of reviewing proposals for demonstration projects under this section. The project review committee consists of

the commissioner of the department, or the commissioner’s designee;

the commissioner of administration, or the commissioner’s designee;

the chief executive officer of the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority, or the chief executive officer’s designee, who shall serve as chair of the committee;

two representatives of stakeholder groups, appointed by the governor for staggered three-year terms, as follows:

one representative of a stakeholder group who has direct experience with health plan management and cost control for the medical assistance population;

one representative of a stakeholder group who has direct experience with health plan management and cost control for a nongovernment employer of 500 or more employees in the state;

a nonvoting member who is a member of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate; and

a nonvoting member who is a member of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.

The department may contract with a managed care organization, primary care case manager, accountable care organization, prepaid ambulatory health plan, or provider-led entity to implement a demonstration project under this section. The fee structure for a contract under this subsection may include global payments, bundled payments, capitated payments, shared savings and risk, or other payment structures. The department shall work with the division of insurance, Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, to streamline the application process for a company to obtain a certificate of authority required under AS

21.09.010

as necessary to participate in a demonstration project under this section.

A proposal for a demonstration project under this section must include, in addition to the elements required under (a) of this section, information demonstrating how the project will implement additional cost-saving measures, including innovations to reduce the cost of care for medical assistance recipients through the expanded use of telehealth for primary care, urgent care, and behavioral health services. The department shall identify legal or cost barriers preventing the expanded use of telehealth and shall recommend remedies for identified barriers.

The department shall contract with a third-party actuary to review demonstration projects established under this section. The actuary shall review each demonstration project after two years of implementation and make recommendations for the implementation of a similar project on a statewide basis. The actuary shall evaluate each project based on cost savings for the medical assistance program, health outcomes for participants in the project, and the ability to achieve similar results on a statewide basis. On or before December 31 of each year, starting in 2018, the actuary shall submit a final report to the department regarding any demonstration project that has been in operation for at least two years.

The department shall prepare a plan regarding regional or statewide implementation of a coordinated care project based on the results of the demonstration projects under this section. On or before November 15, 2019, the department shall submit the plan to the senate secretary and the chief clerk of the house of representatives and notify the legislature that the plan is available. On or before November 15 of each year thereafter, the department shall submit a report regarding any changes or recommendations regarding the plan developed under this subsection to the senate secretary and the chief clerk of the house of representatives and notify the legislature that the report is available.

In this section, “telehealth” has the meaning given in AS

47.05.270(e)

.

History.

(§ 46 ch 25 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Section 46, ch. 25, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect on September 19, 2016.

Sec. 47.07.040.
State plan for provision of medical assistance.

The department shall prepare a state plan in accordance with the provisions of 42 U.S.C. 1396 — 1396p (Title XIX, Social Security Act, Medical Assistance) and submit it for approval to the United States Department of Health and Human Services. The plan shall designate that the Department of Health and Social Services is the single state agency to administer this plan. The department shall act for the state in any negotiations relative to the submission and approval of the plan. The department may make those arrangements or regulatory changes, not inconsistent with law, as may be required under federal law to obtain and retain approval of the United States Department of Health and Human Services to secure for the state the optimum federal payment under the provisions of 42 U.S.C. 1396 — 1396p (Title XIX, Social Security Act, Medical Assistance).

History.

(§ 1 ch 182 SLA 1972; am § 6 ch 105 SLA 1986; am E.O. No. 72 § 3 (1989); am § 32 ch 126 SLA 1994)

Administrative Code. —

For administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 1.

For physician services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 2.

For long-term care — intermediate care facilities and skilled nursing facilities, see 7 AAC 43, art. 3.

For intermediate care facility for the mentally retarded or persons with related conditions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 4.

For hospital services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 5.

For children’s services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 6.

For mental health services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 7.

For authorization of mental health rehabilitation services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 8.

For medical transportation and accommodation services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 9.

For inpatient psychiatric services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 10.

For prescribed drugs and medical supplies, see 7 AAC 43, art. 11.

For dental services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 12.

For prospective payment system; other payment, see 7 AAC 43, art. 14.

For mental health clinic services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 15.

For mental health rehabilitation services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 17.

For home health care services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 20.

For family planning services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 21.

For rural health clinic services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 22.

For federally qualified health centers, see 7 AAC 43, art. 23.

For other services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 26.

For audit and appeal, see 7 AAC 43, art. 31.

For recovery of medicaid expenditures from recipients, see 7 AAC 43, art. 32.

For durable medical equipment and medical supplies; related services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 33.

For definitions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 34.

For submission of information, see 7 AAC 85, art. 1.

For use, disclosure, and access, see 7 AAC 85, art. 2.

For electronic medical records, see 7 AAC 85, art. 3.

For security, see 7 AAC 85, art. 4.

For common medicaid eligibility requirements, see 7 AAC 100, art. 1.

For family medicaid, see 7 AAC 100, art. 2.

For transitional medicaid and extended medicaid, see 7 AAC 100, art. 3.

For under-21 medicaid, see 7 AAC 100, art. 4.

For medicaid for title IV-E adoption and foster care assistance recipients, see 7 AAC 100, art. 5.

For Denali kidcare: pregnant women and newborns, see 7 AAC 100, art. 6.

For Denali kidcare: poverty-level children, see 7 AAC 100, art. 7.

For medicaid eligibility for the aged and disabled, see 7 AAC 100, art. 8.

For long-term care medicaid eligibility, see 7 AAC 100, art. 9.

For long-term care medicaid post eligibility and cost of care, see 7 AAC 100, art. 10.

For medicaid treatment of trusts, see 7 AAC 100, art. 11.

For specialized medicaid eligibility categories, see 7 AAC 100, art. 12.

For medicare premium assistance categories, see 7 AAC 100, art. 13.

For recipient rights and responsibilities, and program integrity, see 7 AAC 100, art. 14.

Sec. 47.07.042.
Recipient cost-sharing.

Except as provided in (b) — (d) of this section, the state plan developed under AS

47.07.040

shall impose deductible, coinsurance, and copayment requirements on persons eligible for assistance under this chapter to the maximum extent allowed under federal law and regulations. The plan must provide that health care providers shall collect the allowable charge. The department shall reduce payments to each provider by the amount of the allowable charge. A provider may not deny services because a recipient is unable to share costs, but an inability to share costs imposed under this section does not relieve the recipient of liability for the costs.

The state plan developed under AS

47.07.040

shall impose a copayment requirement for inpatient hospital services in an amount that is the lesser of

$50 a day, up to a maximum of $200 per discharge; or

the maximum allowed under federal law and regulations.

If the department has clear and compelling reason to believe that application of the maximum allowable charges under (a) of this section to a specific service would not reduce state expenditures or would generate savings to the state that are insignificant in relation to the total cost containment possible, then the department may waive the charges otherwise required under (a) of this section as to that specific service.

In addition to the requirements established under (a) and (b) of this section, the department may require premiums or cost-sharing contributions from recipients who are eligible for benefits under AS

47.07.020(b)(13)

and whose household income is between 150 and 175 percent of the federal poverty line. If the department requires premiums or cost-sharing contributions under this subsection, the department

shall adopt in regulation a sliding scale for those premiums or contributions based on household income;

may not exceed the maximums allowed under federal law; and

shall implement a system by which the department or its designee collects those premiums or contributions.

Except as provided in (c) of this section and notwithstanding (b) of this section, the department may require premiums and other cost-sharing contributions from recipients who are eligible for assistance under AS

47.07.020(b)(15)

to the maximum extent allowed by federal law. If the department requires premiums or other cost-sharing contributions under this subsection, the department shall

adopt in regulation a sliding scale for those premiums or contributions based on household income; and

implement a system by which the department or its designee collects the premiums or other cost-sharing contributions.

[Repealed, § 3 ch 48 SLA 2007.]

History.

(§ 20 ch 102 SLA 1994; am §§ 5, 6 ch 140 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 9 SLA 2003; am §§ 2, 3 ch 34 SLA 2003; am §§ 2, 3 ch 48 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1998, in subsection (d), “AS

47.07.020(b)(13)

” was substituted for “AS

47.07.020(b)(12)

” to reflect the 1998 renumbering of AS

47.07.020(b)(12)

.

Former subsection (f) was enacted as (e); relettered in 2003, at which time “(f) of this section” was substituted for “(e) of this section” in subsection (d).

Cross references. —

For legislative purposes in enacting this section, see § 1, ch. 102, SLA 1994 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

For statement of legislative intent for subsection (e), see § 1, ch. 9, SLA 2003, in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts.
For transitional provisions related to continued eligibility of current recipients, current program regulations, and continued eligibility for assistance under current state plan provisions until amended, see §§ 5 — 7, ch. 9, SLA 2003, in the 2003 Temporary and Special Acts.

For federal poverty guidelines, see aspe.hhs.gov/poverty-guidelines.

Administrative Code. —

For administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2003 amendment, effective April 17, 2003, added subsection (e).

The second 2003 amendment, effective August 31, 2003, substituted “income is greater than the applicable amount set out in (e) of this section” for “income is between 150 and 200 percent of the federal poverty guideline” in the first sentence in subsection (d) and added subsection (f).

The 2007 amendment, effective July 10, 2007, substituted “between 150 and 175 percent of the federal poverty line” for “greater than the applicable amount set out in (f) of this section” in the first sentence of subsection (d), and repealed subsection (f).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 22, ch. 102, SLA 1994 provides that the charges provided for under this section “apply to services performed on or after July 1, 1994.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning the amendment of subsection (a) and the addition of subsection (d) by ch. 140, SLA 1998 (CSHB 369(FIN)am), see 1998 House Journal 2159.

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 34, SLA 2003 (SB 105), which amended (d) and added (f) of this section, see 2003 Senate Journal 389—390.

Sec. 47.07.045.
Home and community-based services.

The department may provide home and community-based services under a waiver in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 1396 — 1396p (Title XIX, Social Security Act), this chapter, and regulations adopted under this chapter, if the department has received approval from the federal government and the department has appropriations allocated for the purpose. To supplement the standards in (b) of this section, the department shall establish in regulation additional standards for eligibility and payment for the services.

Before the department may terminate payment for services provided under (a) of this section

the recipient must have had an annual assessment to determine whether the recipient continues to meet the standards under (a) of this section;

the annual assessment must have been reviewed by an independent qualified health care professional under contract with the department; for purposes of this paragraph, “independent qualified health care professional” means,

for a waiver based on intellectual or developmental disability, a person who is qualified under 42 C.F.R. 483.430 as a qualified intellectual disability professional;

for other allowable waivers, a registered or advanced practice registered nurse licensed under AS 08.68 who is qualified to assess children with complex medical conditions, older Alaskans, and adults with physical disabilities for medical assistance waivers; and

the annual assessment must find that the recipient’s condition has materially improved since the previous assessment; for purposes of this paragraph, “materially improved” means that a recipient who has previously qualified for a waiver for

a child with complex medical conditions, no longer needs technical assistance for a life-threatening condition, and is expected to be placed in a skilled nursing facility for less than 30 days each year;

intellectual or developmental disability, no longer needs the level of care provided by an intermediate care facility for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities either because the qualifying diagnosis has changed or the recipient is able to demonstrate the ability to function in a home setting without the need for waiver services; or

an older Alaskan or adult with a physical disability, no longer has a functional limitation or cognitive impairment that would result in the need for nursing home placement, and is able to demonstrate the ability to function in a home setting without the need for waiver services.

If a child who is financially dependent on a military service member is eligible for home and community-based services while physically present in the state, the department shall provide for home and community-based services when the child returns to the state as though the child had remained in the state if the military service member provides proof acceptable to the department that

the member has maintained residency in the state for the period of eligibility; proof under this paragraph must include official military personnel records;

the member and the dependent child are physically present in the state and intend to reside permanently in the state while receiving the home and community-based services;

the member returned to the state within 18 months after separating from military service; and

the member’s dependent child is not eligible for coverage of home and community-based services under another health insurance plan.

In (c) of this section, “military” means the armed forces of the United States, the United States Coast Guard, or the Alaska National Guard.

History.

(§ 8 ch 96 SLA 2006; am § 17 ch 42 SLA 2013; am § 10 ch 102 SLA 2014; am § 49 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For transitional provision extending program regulations on home and community-based services that are in effect on August 1, 2006, if the regulations are not inconsistent with the language and purposes of this section, see § 12,
ch. 96, SLA 2006, in the 2006 Temporary and Special Acts. For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 102, SLA 2014, adding subsections (c) and (d) to this section, see 2014 Senate Journal 1469 — 1470.

Administrative Code. —

For home and community-based waiver services; nursing facility and ICF/MR level of care, see 7 AAC 43, art. 28.

For home and community-based waiver services; residential psychiatric treatment center level of care, see 7 AAC 43, art. 29.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective September 1, 2013, in (b)(2)(A), rewrote the subparagraph, which read, “for a waiver based on mental retardation or developmental disability, a person who is qualified under 42 CFR 483.430 as a mental retardation professional”; in (b)(3)(B), substituted “intellectual” for “mental retardation” at the beginning, and substituted “persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities” for “the mentally retarded”.

The 2014 amendment, effective July 29, 2014, added (c) and (d).

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (b)(2)(B), inserted “or advanced practice registered” preceding “nurse”.

Sec. 47.07.046.
Traumatic or acquired brain injury services.

The department shall provide traumatic or acquired brain injury services under a waiver in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 1396 — 1396p (Title XIX, Social Security Act), this chapter, and regulations adopted under this chapter, if the department has received approval from the federal government and the department has appropriations allocated for the purpose. In addition to the annual assessment required in (b) of this section, the department shall establish in regulation additional standards for eligibility and payment for the services.

Before the department may terminate payment for services provided under (a) of this section, the recipient must have had an annual assessment to determine whether the recipient continues to meet the standards established by regulation under (a) of this section.

In this section, “traumatic or acquired brain injury” has the meaning given in AS

47.80.529

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 109 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, in (c) of this section, “AS

47.80.529

” was substituted for “AS 47.80.590” to conform to the 2010 renumbering of that section.

Effective dates. —

Section 4, ch. 109, SLA 2010, which enacted this section, is effective September 23, 2010.

Sec. 47.07.050.
Implementation of the medical assistance program.

The department shall take the steps necessary to adopt those regulations, prepare necessary documentation for the state and providers, and undertake the systems design that may be necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter on or before November 1, 1972.
Implementation of the medical assistance program shall include appropriate controls and reporting capabilities as required by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, and the department shall make those necessary reports as required by that federal agency or as requested by the legislature.

History.

(§ 1 ch 182 SLA 1972)

Administrative Code. —

For public assistance, see 7 AAC 37.

For administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 1.

For physician services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 2.

For long-term care — intermediate care facilities and skilled nursing facilities, see 7 AAC 43, art. 3.

For intermediate care facility for the mentally retarded or persons with related conditions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 4.

For hospital services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 5.

For children’s services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 6.

For medical transportation and accommodation services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 9.

For inpatient psychiatric services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 10.

For prescribed drugs and medical supplies, see 7 AAC 43, art. 11.

For dental services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 12.

For family planning services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 21.

For rural health clinic services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 22.

For federally qualified health centers, see 7 AAC 43, art. 23.

For outpatient surgical clinic services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 24.

For program participation — administrative remedies and sanctions, see 7 AAC 43, art. 27.

For home and community-based waiver services; nursing facility and ICF/MR level of care, see 7 AAC 43, art. 28.

For audit and appeal, see 7 AAC 43, art. 31.

Sec. 47.07.055.
Recovery of medical assistance from estates.

The estate of an individual who received medical assistance payments is subject to a claim for recovery of the medical assistance after the individual’s death that, except as provided in (b) of this section, may be secured by a lien filed against the individual’s real property during the individual’s lifetime if the

individual was an inpatient in a nursing facility, intermediate care facility for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, or other medical institution;

department required the individual, as a condition of receiving medical assistance under this chapter, to spend for medical expenses all but a minimal amount of that individual’s income; and

department determined during the individual’s lifetime, after notice and opportunity for hearing, that the individual could not reasonably be expected to be discharged from the institution and to return home.

A lien may not be filed under (a) of this section against an individual’s home if the home is lawfully occupied by the individual’s

spouse;

child under age 21;

blind or disabled child as described in AS

47.25.615

(3) or (5) or 42 U.S.C. 1382(c); or

sibling, if the sibling has an equity interest in the home and was residing in the home for at least one year before the date of the individual’s admission to the institution.

The state may not recover the costs of medical assistance under a lien on a home under (a) of this section until after the death of the individual’s surviving spouse, if any, and only at a time when neither of the following is lawfully residing in the home:

a sibling of the individual who was residing in the individual’s home for a period of at least one year immediately preceding the date of the individual’s institutionalization and who has continuously resided in the home since the institutionalization began; or

a son or daughter of the individual who

resided in the home for at least two years immediately preceding the date of the individual’s institutionalization;

has continuously resided in the home since the institutionalization began; and

establishes to the department’s satisfaction that the son or daughter provided care to the individual that allowed the individual to reside in the home rather than in an institution.

A lien and claim authorized under (a) of this section are extinguished if, during the individual’s lifetime, the individual is discharged from the institution and returns home. However, a new lien and claim are authorized for subsequent expenses if the circumstances described in (a) of this section occur after the individual returns home.

In addition to recovery of medical assistance upon sale of property subject to a lien authorized under (a) — (d) of this section, after an individual’s death, the individual’s estate is subject to a claim for reimbursement for medical assistance payments made on behalf of the individual under this chapter for the following services to the extent that those services were provided when the individual was 55 years of age or older:

services received while an inpatient in a nursing facility, intermediate care facility for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, or other medical institutions; and

home and community-based services provided through a waiver received from the federal government that allows home and community-based services to be covered under this chapter for persons who are eligible for coverage under this chapter while in an institution but who are able to avoid institutionalization because of the provision of home and community-based services.

Other than a recovery upon sale of a home, a claim under this section may be made only after the death of the individual’s surviving spouse, if any, and only at a time when the individual has no surviving child under age 21 and no surviving child who is blind or totally and permanently disabled.

For purposes of AS

13.16.470

, the claims authorized under this section are debts with preference under the laws of the state.

In addition to the claims allowed under the other provisions of this section, the state may file a claim under AS

06.65.320

against the amount in an individual’s program account after the individual dies. Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, the claim is subject to the requirements of 26 U.S.C. 529A(f) (Internal Revenue Code). In this subsection, “program account” has the meaning given in AS

06.65.390

.

History.

(§ 21 ch 102 SLA 1994; am §§ 18, 19 ch 42 SLA 2013; am § 6 ch 56 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For legislative purposes in enacting this section, see § 1, ch. 102, SLA 1994 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For recovery of medicaid expenditures from recipients, see 7 AAC 43, art. 32.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective September 1, 2013, in (a)(1), and in (e)(1), substituted “persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities” for “the mentally retarded”.

The 2016 amendment, effective November 4, 2016, added (h).

Sec. 47.07.060.
Receipt of federal money.

The Department of Administration shall accept and receive all grants of money awarded to the state under 42 U.S.C. 1396 — 1396p (Title XIX, Social Security Act, Medical Assistance). All money received shall be deposited by the Department of Administration in a special account of the general fund and shall be used by the state exclusively for medical assistance and the administration of medical assistance under the provisions of this chapter.
This money shall be paid from the account on a certified disbursement voucher from the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 182 SLA 1972)

Sec. 47.07.063.
Payment for certain services furnished or paid for by a school district.

The department may pay medical assistance under this chapter to a school district on behalf of an eligible child with a disability for rehabilitative and other mandatory and optional services covered under this chapter that are furnished or paid for by the school district if

the school district and the department have entered into an agreement requiring the school district to reimburse the department for any state financial share required by the federal government;

the rehabilitative and other mandatory and optional services are

included in the child’s individualized education program developed under AS

14.30.278

; and

otherwise eligible for reimbursement under this chapter;

the child is a child with a disability who

is eligible for medical assistance under this chapter for the services; and

complies with all applicable provisions of this chapter for that assistance;

the school district fully complies with billing, auditing, and reporting required under the approved state plan described in AS

47.07.040

;

reimbursement of payment for the rehabilitative and other mandatory and optional services under this section does not exceed reimbursement allowable for the services under this chapter; and

all other requirements of federal and state law are met.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of state law, the school district shall allow the department access to medical, financial, and other records of the child that are in the possession of the school district in order to verify eligibility for services under this chapter. The department shall keep information received under this subsection confidential to the same extent as the school district is required to keep the information confidential under law.

The department may adopt regulations to carry out this section.

In this section, unless the context otherwise requires,

“child with a disability” has the meaning given in AS

14.30.350

;

“rehabilitative services” has the meaning given in 42 C.F.R. 440.130;

“school district” has the meaning given the term “district” in AS

14.17.990

, but includes a state boarding school established under AS

14.16.010

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 130 SLA 2002; am §§ 2, 3 ch 93 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (d) of this section was reorganized in 2004 to maintain alphabetical order.

Administrative Code. —

For children’s services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective July 1, 2004, inserted “rehabilitative and other mandatory and optional” three times in subsection (a), and added paragraph (d)(2).

Sec. 47.07.065.
Payment for prescribed drugs.

The department shall pay for prescribed drugs under AS

47.07.030(b)

under regulations adopted by the commissioner in conformity with applicable federal regulations.

The department shall adopt in regulation and regularly update a preferred drug list and a prior authorization medications list under a state program permitted under 42 U.S.C. 1396r-8 (Title XIX, Social Security Act). The department shall take other reasonable cost savings and cost containment measures, including pursuing and securing negotiated rates, rebates, and contracts or other agreements on covered outpatient drugs. In this subsection, “preferred drug list” means a list of prescription medications within a therapeutic class and suggested as the first choice when prescribed for individuals within the medical assistance program.

History.

(§ 5 ch 45 SLA 1989; am § 6 ch 18 SLA 2019)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective August 9, 2019, added (b).

Sec. 47.07.067.
Payment for adult dental services.

Subject to appropriation, the department shall pay for minimum treatment and for preventative and restorative adult dental services provided under AS

47.07.030(b)

and under regulations adopted by the commissioner in conformity with applicable federal requirements and this chapter. Regulations adopted under this section must include the following:

except as provided in (d) of this section, a maximum amount of benefits for preventative and restorative adult dental services of $1,150 for each eligible recipient in a fiscal year; and

specification of the scope of coverage for preventative and restorative adult dental services.

On or before June 30 of each year, the department shall review appropriations available for the purposes of this section for the following fiscal year, and estimate the scope of services to be used and the number of eligible recipients anticipated to be served during the following fiscal year. Notwithstanding the maximum amount of benefits specified in (a)(1) of this section, the department shall reduce, by regulation, the specified maximum amount of benefits for the following fiscal year if the department’s estimates under this subsection would exceed appropriations available for that fiscal year.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of AS 44.62, the department may adopt emergency regulations to implement (b) of this section.

If the department authorizes or approves payment for complete or partial dentures for an eligible recipient, the department may authorize the payment in one fiscal year of the maximum payment amount for not more than two fiscal years. A recipient is not eligible for additional benefits under this section for a two-year period.

As used in this section, “minimum treatment” means the application or prescription of a medication or material deemed necessary by a licensed dentist for the immediate relief of pain or to reduce the spread of infection.

History.

(§ 2 ch 52 SLA 2006; § 1 ch 35 SLA 2009; am §§ 1, 2 ch 60 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 1, ch. 35, SLA 2009 repealed § 5, ch. 52, SLA 2006, which was to have repealed this section June 30, 2009.

Subsection (d) was enacted as (e); relettered in 2010, at which time subsection (d) was relettered as (e) and a conforming amendment made in the 2010 amendment of subsection (a).

Administrative Code. —

For dental services, see 7 AAC 43, art. 12.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective September 7, 2010, in (a)(1), added “except as provided in (d) of this section,”; added (e) (now (d)).

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 52, SLA 2006 (HB 105), proposing coverage for adult dental services for eligible recipients under the Medicaid program (AS 47.07), see 2005 House Journal 151 - 153.

Sec. 47.07.068.
Payment for abortions.

The department may not pay for abortion services under this chapter unless the abortion services are for a medically necessary abortion or the pregnancy was the result of rape or incest. Payment may not be made for an elective abortion.

In this section,

“abortion” has the meaning given in AS

18.16.090

;

“elective abortion” means an abortion that is not a medically necessary abortion;

“medically necessary abortion” means that, in a physician’s objective and reasonable professional judgment after considering medically relevant factors, an abortion must be performed to avoid a threat of serious risk to the life or physical health of a woman from continuation of the woman’s pregnancy;

“serious risk to the life or physical health” includes, but is not limited to, a serious risk to the pregnant woman of

death; or

impairment of a major bodily function because of

diabetes with acute metabolic derangement or severe end organ damage;

renal disease that requires dialysis treatment;

severe pre-eclampsia;

eclampsia;

convulsions;

status epilepticus;

sickle cell anemia;

severe congenital or acquired heart disease, class IV;

pulmonary hypertension;

malignancy if pregnancy would prevent or limit treatment;

kidney infection;

congestive heart failure;

epilepsy;

seizures;

coma;

severe infection exacerbated by pregnancy;

rupture of amniotic membranes;

advanced cervical dilation of more than six centimeters at less than 22 weeks gestation;

cervical or cesarean section scar ectopic implantation;

any pregnancy not implanted in the uterine cavity;

amniotic fluid embolus; or

another physical disorder, physical injury, or physical illness, including a life-endangering physical condition caused by or arising from the pregnancy that places the woman in danger of death or major bodily impairment if an abortion is not performed.

History.

(§ 2 ch 8 SLA 2014)

Effective dates. —

Section 2, chapter 8, SLA 2014, which enacted this section, took effect on July 16, 2014.

Editor’s notes. —

For a statement of legislative intent relating to this section and the funding of existing women’s health programs, see sec. 1, ch. 8, SLA 2014.